Maryland, session 2025, HB0801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
SUBTITLE 5. MARYLAND FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT CENTER NETWORK PILOT
PROGRAM.
1–501.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0801*

HOUSE BILL 801
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CENTER” MEANS A FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT CENTER ESTABLISHED
UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(C) “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT CENTER
NETWORK PILOT PROGRAM.
1–502.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT CENTER NETWORK
PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM IS TO ESTABLISH A STATEWIDE
NETWORK OF FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT CENTERS IN DIFFERENT REGIONS OF THE
STATE.
(C) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE PILOT
PROGRAM.
1–503.
(A) (1) EACH CENTER SHALL PROVIDE ONE–ON–ONE FINANCIAL
COUNSELING AND COACHING SERVICES FREE OF CHARGE, INCLUDING
INFORMATION ON HOW TO:
(I) INCREASE SAVINGS;
(II) PAY DOWN DEBT;
(III) ACCESS BANKING; AND
(IV) IMPROVE CREDIT SCORES.
(2) EACH CENTER SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION AVAILABLE IN ENGLISH, SPANISH, AND ANY OTHER LANGUAGE
REQUIRED BY THE OFFICE.
(B) EACH FINANCIAL COUNSELOR EMPLOYED BY A CENTER SHALL
COMPLETE TRAINING THAT MEETS OR EXCEEDS THE FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT
CENTER COUNSELOR TRAINING STANDARDS DEVELOPED BY THE CITIES FOR
FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT FUND.

HOUSE BILL 801 3
1–504.
FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION TO THE COMPTROLLER IN AN AMOUNT
SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE COSTS OF THE PILOT PROGRAM.
1–505.
THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.